Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.500

Trial skills training for prosecutors.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the criminal justice training commission shall provide trial skills training for practitioners who are new to prosecution, or contract with an entity that serves prosecuting attorneys in Washington to provide that training. The program must include and prioritize training for practitioners in underserved areas and rural areas of the state. The program must offer intensive trial skill development, incorporate prosecution best practices, provide training related to ethical duties of prosecutors, and offer networking opportunities. Trainings may incorporate in-person, remote, and recorded resources. By June 30, 2026, the criminal justice training commission, or its grantee who serves prosecuting attorneys in Washington, shall expand a trial skills program to include advanced trial skills training.

[ 2024 c 293 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 293: See note following RCW 2.70.120.